Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2942
Costs.

The costs of the mediation process shall be paid by the parties. If the court orders the parties to mediation, the costs to the parties shall be charged according to a sliding fee scale as established by the State Court Administrator.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 23.